Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF672.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2160YH (6) 91 je/js H.F. 672 Section 1. Section 20.9, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 1. For negotiations regarding a bargaining unit with 3 at least thirty percent of members who are public safety 4 employees, the public employer and the employee organization 5 shall meet at reasonable times, including meetings reasonably 6 in advance of the public employerâs budget-making process, 7 to negotiate in good faith with respect to wages, hours, 8 vacations, insurance, holidays, leaves of absence, shift 9 differentials, overtime compensation, supplemental pay, 10 seniority, transfer procedures, job classifications, health 11 and safety matters, evaluation procedures, procedures for 12 staff reduction, in-service training, grievance procedures 13 for resolving any questions arising under the agreement, 14 and other matters mutually agreed upon. For negotiations 15 regarding a bargaining unit that does not have at least 16 thirty percent of members who are public safety employees, 17 the public employer and the employee organization shall meet 18 at reasonable times, including meetings reasonably in advance 19 of the public employerâs budget-making process, to negotiate 20 in good faith with respect to base wages and other matters 21 mutually agreed upon. Such obligation to negotiate in good 22 faith does not compel either party to agree to a proposal 23 or make a concession. Mandatory subjects of negotiation 24 specified in this subsection shall be interpreted narrowly and 25 restrictively. 26 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to collective 27 bargaining procedures pursuant to chapter 20 initiated on or 28 after the effective date of this Act. 29